Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 26-12-101.
“Industrial insured” defined.

As used in this chapter:

“Industrial insured” means an insured:

Which procures the insurance of any risk other than life and annuity contracts through the services of a full-time employee acting as an insurance manager or buyer or the services of a regularly and continuously retained qualified insurance consultant;

Whose aggregate annual premiums for insurance on all risks total at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00); and

Which has at least twenty-five (25) full-time employees.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 231; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-231; Laws 1971, ch. 3, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Preston v. Natrona Serv., Inc., 489 P.2d 622,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 26-12-102.
Representing or aiding unauthorized insurers prohibited; exceptions.

No person in this state shall:

Act as agent for, or otherwise represent or aid on behalf of another, any insurer not then authorized to transact insurance in this state, in the:

Solicitation, negotiation, procurement or carrying out of insurance or annuity contracts or the renewal thereof;

Forwarding of applications for insurance;

Dissemination of information as to coverage or rates;

Inspection of risks;

Fixing of rates;

Investigation or adjustment of claims or losses; or

Collection or forwarding of premiums.

In any other manner represent or assist that insurer in transacting insurance with respect to subjects of insurance resident, located or to be performed in this state.

This section does not apply to:

Matters the commissioner authorizes under W.S.

26-12-201

through

26-12-206

;

Surplus lines insurance and other transactions for which the insurer is not required to have a certificate of authority pursuant to W.S.

26-3-102

;

A licensed adjuster or attorney-at-law representing an unauthorized insurer in his professional capacity;

Persons in this state compensated solely by salary, who secure and furnish information for the purpose of enrolling individuals in, or issuing certificates under, or otherwise assisting in administering group life, group or blanket disability or annuity contracts lawfully solicited, issued and delivered in and pursuant to the laws of a state in which the insurer is authorized to transact business;

Transactions in this state involving contracts of insurance issued to one (1) or more industrial insureds.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 231; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-231; Laws 1971, ch. 3, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-12-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

made a stylistic change in (a)(i)(G).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Preston v. Natrona Serv., Inc., 489 P.2d 622,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 26-12-103.
Suits by unauthorized insurers prohibited.

As to transactions not permitted under W.S.

26-3-102

, no unauthorized insurer shall institute or file or cause to be instituted or filed, any suit, action or proceeding in this state to enforce any right, claim or demand arising out of any insurance transaction in this state, until the insurer obtains a certificate of authority to transact that insurance in this state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 232; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-232; W.S. 1977, §

26-12-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.